Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB688.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 12514. Voting by county commissioner on certain appointments.(a) Prohibition.--A county commissioner may not vote on the appointment of a member of a board, authority or similar body established to improve the economic development of the county if a member of the immediate family of the county commissioner is an executive-level employee of the board, authority or similar body or is employed by an entity that receives a grant, loan or contract from the board, authority or similar body.(b) Abstention.--A county commissioner under subsection (a) shall refrain from voting in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. § 1103(j) (relating to restricted activities).(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following 12345678910111213141516171819 words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Executive-level employee." An employee of a board, authority or similar body established by the county commissioners with discretionary powers that may affect the outcome of a decision in relation to a private corporation or business or an employee who by virtue of the employee's job function could influence the outcome of a decision."Immediate family." A parent, spouse, child, brother or sister.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0688PN0667 - 2 - 1234567891011